Florida, session 2026, SB1376.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 23 24 Section 1.âSection 1009.8963, Florida Statutes, is created 25 to read: 26 1009.8963âThe Genetic Counseling Education Enhancement 27 Grant Program.â 28 (1)âThe Genetic Counseling Education Enhancement Grant 29 Program is created within the State University System to support 30 the development, growth, and sustainability of graduate level 31 genetic counseling programs accredited by the Accreditation 32 Council for Genetic Counseling. The Board of Governors shall 33 award competitive grants to state universities to address 34 faculty shortages, student financial barriers, and clinical 35 training needs in genetic counseling. 36 (2)âSubject to appropriation, the board shall award funds 37 to: 38 (a)âEstablish an accredited program at a state university 39 through a one-time start-up grant based upon an application 40 submitted in a format prescribed by the board. The application 41 must include: 42 1.âA detailed plan demonstrating how grant funds will be 43 used to achieve program accreditation. 44 2.âThe projected outcomes of establishing the program, 45 including all of the following: 46 a.âThe anticipated program enrollment. 47 b.âThe plan for hiring and retaining faculty for the 48 program. 49 c.âThe anticipated program completion rates. 50 d.âThe anticipated first-time American Board of Genetic 51 Counseling board certification examination passage rates. 52 e.âThe anticipated program contributions to the stateâs 53 genetic counseling workforce. 54 3.âDocumentation demonstrating that the proposed program is 55 supported by sufficient clinical training capacity consistent 56 with nationally recognized accreditation standards and that the 57 proposed growth represents a net increase in statewide training 58 opportunities rather than a redistribution of existing 59 supervision resources. 60 (b)âAccredited programs based on program performance 61 according to the following metrics: 62 1.âThe number of students completing the genetic counseling 63 program. 64 2.âThe first-time American Board of Genetic Counseling, 65 Inc., board certification examination passage rate for students 66 completing the state universityâs genetic counseling program. 67 68 The program shall reward excellence among genetic counseling 69 programs with an average first-time American Board of Genetic 70 Counseling, Inc., board certification examination passage rate 71 above the national average. 72 (3)(a)âGrant funds provided through the program must be 73 used for: 74 1.âThe recruitment and retention of qualified faculty, 75 including, but not limited to, salaries, professional 76 development, and incentives. 77 2.âFinancial assistance to students enrolled in the 78 accredited program. Such financial assistance must be in the 79 form of scholarships that cover tuition, required books and 80 materials, and reasonable living expenses. 81 3.âThe establishment and maintenance of clinical rotations 82 required for completion of the masterâs degree in genetic 83 counseling, including partnerships with health care facilities 84 for supervised practicum experiences, simulation training 85 resources, and faculty oversight. 86 (b)âGrant funds may not be used for: 87 1.âGeneral administrative overhead costs. 88 2.âThe construction of new facilities. 89 3.âNonprogram-related activities. 90 (c)âState universities that receive a grant through the 91 program must maintain records sufficient to demonstrate 92 compliance with this subsection. 93 (4)(a)âEach state university receiving funds pursuant to 94 this section shall submit an annual report to the board. The 95 report must include: 96 1.âExpenditures. 97 2.âThe outcomes achieved using grant funds. 98 3.âPlans for the upcoming fiscal year for the program. 99 (b)âThe board shall annually compile the reports into a 100 statewide summary. The summary must be submitted to the 101 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the 102 House of Representatives by July 1 of each year. 103 (5)âThe Board of Governors shall adopt regulations to 104 administer this section. 105 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.